Utah statutes.
34-34-12.   Injunction against violating chapter.

In addition to the penal provisions of this chapter, any person, firm, corporation, association, or any labor union, labor organization or any other type of association, or any officer, representative, agent or member thereof may be restrained by injunction from doing or continuing to do any of the matters and things prohibited by this chapter.

